Florida, session 2026, SB1254.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 67 68 Section 1.âSection 351.41, Florida Statutes, is created to 69 read: 70 351.41âRapid Rail Transit Compact.âThe Governor, on behalf 71 of this state, is hereby authorized to execute a compact, in 72 substantially the following form, with the States of Alabama, 73 Louisiana, and Mississippi, and the Legislature hereby signifies 74 in advance its approval and ratification of such compact: 75 76 RAPID RAIL TRANSIT COMPACT 77 ARTICLE I 78 The purpose of this compact is to study the feasibility of 79 rapid rail transit service between the states of Alabama, 80 Florida, Louisiana, and Mississippi and to establish a joint 81 interstate commission to assist in this effort. 82 83 ARTICLE II 84 This compact shall become effective immediately as to the 85 states ratifying it whenever the States of Alabama, Florida, 86 Louisiana, and Mississippi have ratified it and Congress has 87 given consent thereto. Any state not mentioned in this article 88 which is contiguous with any member state may become a party to 89 this compact, subject to approval by the legislature of each of 90 the member states. 91 92 ARTICLE III 93 The states which are parties to this compact, hereinafter 94 referred to as party states, do hereby establish and create a 95 joint agency which shall be known as the Southern Rail 96 Commission, hereinafter referred to as the commission, or any 97 successor name adopted by all members of the commission. The 98 membership of such commission shall consist of the governor of 99 each party state, one representative each from the Mississippi 100 Energy and Transportation Board, or its successor, the Office of 101 Aviation and Public Transportation of the Louisiana Department 102 of Transportation and Development, or its successor, the Alabama 103 Department of Energy, or its successor, and the Florida 104 Department of Transportation, or its successor, and five other 105 citizens of each party state, to be appointed by the governor 106 thereof. The appointed members of the commission shall serve for 107 terms of 4 years each. Vacancies on the commission shall be 108 filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion 109 of the term. The members of the commission shall not be 110 compensated for service on the commission, but each of the 111 appointed members shall be entitled to actual and reasonable 112 expenses incurred in attending meetings, or incurred otherwise 113 in the performance of his or her duties as a member of the 114 commission. The members of the commission shall hold regular 115 quarterly meetings and such special meetings as its business may 116 require. They shall choose annually a chairman and vice chairman 117 from among their members, and the chairmanship shall rotate each 118 year among the party states in order of their acceptance of this 119 compact. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations for 120 the transaction of its business and a record shall be kept of 121 all its business. It shall be the duty of the commission to 122 study the feasibility of providing interstate rapid rail transit 123 service between the party states. Toward this end, the 124 commission shall have power to hold hearings; to conduct studies 125 and surveys of all problems, benefits, and other matters 126 associated with such service, and to make reports thereon; to 127 acquire, by gift, grant, or otherwise, from local, state, 128 federal, or private sources, such money or property as may be 129 provided for the proper performance of its functions, and to 130 hold and dispose of same; to cooperate with other public or 131 private groups, whether local, state, regional, or national, 132 having an interest in such service; to formulate and execute 133 plans and policies for emphasizing the purpose of this compact 134 before the Congress of the United States and other appropriate 135 officers and agencies of the United States; and to exercise such 136 other powers as may be appropriate to enable it to accomplish 137 its functions and duties and to carry out the purposes of this 138 compact. 139 140 ARTICLE IV 141 Each party state agrees that its legislature may, in its 142 discretion, from time to time make available and pay over to the 143 commission funds for the establishment and operation of the 144 commission. The contributions of each party state shall be in 145 equal amounts, if possible, but nothing in this article shall be 146 construed as binding the legislature of any state to make an 147 appropriation of a set amount of funds at any particular time. 148 149 ARTICLE V 150 Nothing in this compact shall be construed so as to 151 conflict with any existing statute, or to limit the powers of 152 any party state, or to repeal or prevent legislation, or to 153 affect any existing or future cooperative arrangement or 154 relationship between any federal agency and a party state. 155 156 ARTICLE VI 157 (1)âThis compact shall continue in force and remain binding 158 upon each party state until the legislature or governor of each 159 or any state takes action to withdraw therefrom. However, any 160 such withdrawal does not become effective until 6 months after 161 the date of the action taken by the legislature or governor. 162 Notice of such action shall be given to the other party state or 163 states by the secretary of state of the party state which takes 164 such action. 165 (2)âThere is hereby granted to the Governors of each state, 166 to the members of the commission for Alabama, Florida, 167 Louisiana, and Mississippi, and to the compact administrator all 168 the powers provided for in the compact and in this section. All 169 officers of this state are hereby authorized and directed to do 170 all things falling within their respective jurisdictions which 171 are necessary or incidental to carrying out the purpose of the 172 compact. 173 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.